Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 1

Authorized Appropriations Generally

5-9-101. Miscellaneous purposes.

The county legislative body may appropriate moneys as follows:

For the payment of jurors;

For the payment of costs of criminal prosecutions chargeable by law to the county;

For the support of people who are indigent or have mental illness or intellectual or developmental disabilities;

For the burial or cremation expenses of any poor person dying in the county, leaving no means to pay for the same;

For the purchase of record books for the use of the circuit and chancery court clerks, the county clerk and the county register;

To pay solicitors, sheriffs and clerks for ex officio services;

To pay clerks for making out tax lists;

To pay the county mayor for the county mayor's services as financial agent of the county;

To pay the county mayor for other services;

To pay commissioners for settling with the officers entrusted with the collection of the public or county revenue;

For building, repairing and taking care of courthouses, jails and other county buildings;

For purchasing tools for overseers of roads;

For weights and measures;

For building bridges; but no county legislative body of this state shall appropriate any moneys to repair or build any bridges on chartered turnpike roads that charge and collect toll;

To compensate a judge of the court of general sessions and officers concerned in the arrest and examination of a person charged with a felony, as provided in this code;

For exhibits and buildings and other permanent improvements for or at county and state fairs;

For aiding farmers' cooperative demonstration work;

For public and permanent statutes of this state;

Toward the construction or maintenance of a public market house;

Toward the printing of histories of the county, and further in aid of the construction of markers or monuments of a historical character within the bounds of the county and toward the acquisition and development of historic sites, structures and buildings in the county;

To purchase all necessary equipment for use by the sheriff of the county for the preservation of the peace and for the service and execution of all process, criminal and civil, and to pay the salaries of deputy sheriffs appointed pursuant to title 8, chapter 20;

To make appropriations for the purpose of participating with the federal government in community planning services and training of older people or senior citizens in accordance with the Older Americans Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.);

To nonprofit volunteer fire departments or to nonprofit county-wide fire departments authorized by § 5-17-101, upon such terms as may be agreed to by the county legislative bodies;

To make appropriations for the purpose of participating with either the state or federal government, or both of them, to provide services and facilities for people with mental illness or intellectual or developmental disabilities;

To appropriate funds for any project otherwise statutorily authorized; and

For economic and community development.

Code 1858, § 4215 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 14; 1833, ch. 89, §§ 1, 2; 1833, ch. 92, § 16; 1855-1856, ch. 145, § 1); 1879, ch. 192, § 1; 1907, ch. 513, § 1; 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 27, § 1; 1915, ch. 148, § 1; 1917, ch. 27, § 1; 1917, ch. 43, § 1; Shan., § 6045; Acts 1919, ch. 72, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 10242; Acts 1943, ch. 91, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10242; Acts 1951, ch. 4, § 1; modified; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 14, § 1; Acts 1967, ch. 57, § 1; 1971, ch. 8, § 1; 1975, ch. 9, § 1; 1976, ch. 647, § 1; 1978, ch. 674, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-901; Acts 1980, ch. 731, §§ 1-3; 1986, ch. 725, § 1; 1989, ch. 189, § 1; 2003, ch. 51, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2011, ch. 158, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Advertising and tourist promotion, appropriations, title 5, ch. 9, part 2.

Ambulance service, title 7, ch. 61.

Armories, authority to provide, §§ 58-1-508, 58-1-509.

Audit, expenses, § 8-15-104.

Books for register, furnishing, § 10-7-102.

Cemeteries, funds for maintenance, § 46-2-107.

Children's receiving homes, appropriations, § 37-2-302.

Civil defense, federal aid for, § 58-2-124.

Contributions to public welfare hospitals, §§ 68-11-504 — 68-11-506.

County taxes paid under protest, § 67-1-912.

Defense, appropriations of money or property for, § 58-1-510.

Deputy sheriffs, appropriation for payment, § 8-22-111.

Drainage, levee or improvement districts, preliminary expenses, advancement, § 69-6-132.

Educational institutions, contributions to tax-supported colleges, universities and institutions of higher learning, § 49-7-108.

Financing for state emergency management agency, § 58-2-109.

Health demonstration work in state department of health, making appropriations for, § 68-1-105.

Highway safety program, title 55, ch. 20.

Library, establishment authorized, contracting for, § 10-3-101.

Obtaining state disaster relief funds, § 58-2-501.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Record books, authority to have rebound, § 10-7-119.

Reimbursement for personnel and property, § 58-2-115.

Use of county revenue, generally, § 5-8-107.

Veterans' memorials, erection, title 58, ch. 4, part 2.

Veterans' service offices, title 58, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 24; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 9; 20 Tenn. Juris., Paupers, § 1; 22 Tenn. Juris., Schools, § 28.

Attorney General Opinions. Funding volunteer fire departments, OAG 97-141, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (10/14/97).

County executive's [now county mayor's] authority over sheriff's department purchasing, OAG 99-051, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (3/4/99).

Funding volunteer fire service, OAG 07-087, 2007 Op. Atty Gen. Tenn. 1 (6/5/07).

Clarification of OAG 07-087, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 134 (6/5/07), regarding funding of volunteer fire departments, OAG 07-134, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 134 (9/11/07).

No state law or constitutional provision requires a local government to provide a burial, cremation, or other funeral services for indigent individuals. State law requires only that each county cover the expenses, when necessary, for the burial or cremation of unclaimed bodies by the coroner or medical examiner. OAG 18-13, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (3/20/2018).

5-9-102. State and county fairs.

The county legislative bodies are empowered to make appropriations of money to provide for exhibits of their agriculture, horticulture, and mineral products and resources and manufactured products and the erection of buildings and other permanent improvements at the fairs to be held within the respective counties, and for exhibits of their agriculture, horticulture, and mineral products and resources and manufactured products and the erection of buildings at the Tennessee state fair held annually at Nashville, under the management of the Tennessee State Fair Association; and to provide ways and means and prescribe rules and regulations governing the expenditure of any moneys so appropriated.

Acts 1907, ch. 513, § 1; Shan., § 373a28; Acts 1919, ch. 72, § 1; Code 1932, § 10250; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-902.

5-9-103. Market houses.

The county legislative body is authorized to appropriate money towards the construction or maintenance of a public market house, to be erected within the confines of the county, and to be used for general public market purposes.

Acts 1917, ch. 27, § 1; Shan., § 6050a1; Code 1932, § 10256; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-903.

5-9-104. Farmers' extension work.

The county legislative bodies are empowered to appropriate annually such an amount of money as may be deemed necessary or expedient in order to cooperate with the division of extension of the college of agricultural sciences and natural resources of the University of Tennessee, in its farm demonstration and agricultural extension work, to be conducted by such college in cooperation with the United States department of agriculture through the Smith-Lever bill (7 U.S.C. § 341 et seq.), the farmer's demonstration work, or other work supported by acts of congress, or in its extension work to be conducted through appropriations from the state, or through moneys received from any other source.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 27, § 1; 1915, ch. 148, § 1; Shan., § 373a29; Code 1932, § 10251; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-904.

5-9-105. Purchases of code.

The county legislative body, composed of the members thereof, is authorized to purchase, from time to time, compilations of the public and permanent statutes of this state, for the use of judges of the court of general sessions and county officers, and to make appropriations of county funds for such purpose.

No judge of the court of general sessions or county officer furnished with a compilation under this section shall acquire any personal ownership or title thereto, but all such compilations shall be and remain the property of the county.

All laws pertaining to the preservation, safekeeping and transmission of official books and papers from incumbents to their successors in office shall be in force and applicable to all copies of compilations purchased under this section.

Acts 1917, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 6050a2, 6050a3; Code 1932, §§ 10257, 10258; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-905.

5-9-106. Soil conservation.

The county legislative bodies in all counties having soil conservation districts are hereby authorized and empowered to:

Appropriate county funds for the purchase of equipment that is not available locally on a fair rental basis as may be needed in conservation work;

Employ such secretarial help as may be needed;

Purchase such office equipment and supplies as may be needed;

Pay for the rental of office space; and

Promote projects that are considered beneficial to the soil conservation program.

After the funds are appropriated, they shall be paid out in accordance with the resolution of the county legislative body but under the supervision of the supervisors of the district for which the funds were appropriated, and county warrants shall be drawn and issued in the same way and manner as the law prescribes for warrants to be drawn and issued against the county's general fund.

Acts 1957, ch. 370, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-923.

Cross-References. Soil conservation districts, title 43, ch. 14, part 2.

5-9-107. Watershed development.

Any county may make financial contributions to any watershed development authority created by special act of the general assembly, where a portion or all of the watershed development administered by such authority lies within the territory of such county.

Such contributions shall only be made when authorized by the legislative body of such county, and from the general funds of the county. No special tax may be levied therefor.

The amount of such contribution shall be as fixed by such county legislative body and sanctioned thereby as a county purpose, the development of which being beneficial to such county.

Acts 1965, ch. 339, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-930.

5-9-108. Medical services.

The county legislative body or governing body of each county is authorized and empowered in its discretion to appropriate from the general funds of such county a sum of money for the purpose of defraying the cost of acquiring real estate and partially funding the operation of a nonprofit corporation that provides, through the national health service corps, medical services to members of the community for a fee and to indigent patients without charge; provided, that such nonprofit corporation is eligible for financial assistance by agencies of the state or federal government under any of its programs.

Any funds appropriated for this purpose need not be repaid to the county by the nonprofit corporation.

Acts 1973, ch. 148, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-931.

5-9-109. Charitable and civic organizations.

The county legislative body or governing body of each county may appropriate funds for the financial aid of any nonprofit charitable organization, any chamber of commerce, exempt from taxation pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, § 501(c)(6) (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(6)), or any nonprofit civic organization in accordance with the guidelines required by subsection (b).

For the purposes of this section:

A nonprofit charitable organization is one in which no part of the net earnings inures or may lawfully inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual and that provides services benefiting the general welfare of the residents of the county; and

A nonprofit civic organization means a civic organization exempt from taxation pursuant to § 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(4)), that operates primarily in the county for the purpose of bringing about civic betterments and social improvements through efforts to maintain and increase employment opportunities in the county by promoting industry, trade, commerce, tourism and recreation by inducing manufacturing, industrial, governmental, educational, financial, service, commercial, recreational and agricultural enterprises to locate in or remain in the county.

The statement of public policy set forth in Acts 1955, chapter 209, § 3 is hereby incorporated into and made a part of this section, and it is hereby determined and declared that appropriations authorized by this section are needed to relieve the emergency created by the continuing migration from Tennessee and its counties of a large number of its citizens in order to find employment elsewhere, and to enable the counties of the state to assist nonprofit organizations in furthering the economic development, social welfare and common good of its residents.

Each county legislative body shall devise guidelines directing for what purposes the appropriated money may be spent. These guidelines shall provide generally that any funds appropriated shall be used to promote the general welfare of the residents of the county. Any funds appropriated under this section shall be used and expended under the direction and control of the county legislative bodies.

Any nonprofit organization that desires financial assistance from the county legislative body or the governing body of the county shall file with the county clerk a copy of an annual report of its business affairs and transactions, which includes, but is not limited to, a copy of an annual audit, a description of the program that serves the residents of the county, and the proposed use of the county assistance.

Such report will be open for public inspection during the regular business hours of the county clerk's office.

Any nonprofit organization that desires such financial assistance may file, in lieu of the annual audit, an annual report detailing all receipts and expenditures in a form prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

Such report shall be prepared and certified by the chief financial officer of such nonprofit organization.

Financial reports shall be available to fiscal officers of the county and shall be subject to audit under § 4-3-304.

Appropriations to nonprofit organizations other than charitable organizations may be made only when notices have been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of the intent to make an appropriation to a nonprofit but not charitable organization, specifying the intended amount of the appropriation and the purposes for which the appropriation will be spent.

Acts 1976, ch. 696, § 1; 1977, ch. 120, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 132, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-932; Acts 1984, ch. 820, §§ 1, 3; 1989, ch. 62, § 1; 1992, ch. 545, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 106, § 1; 1999, ch. 38, § 1; 2010, ch. 740, § 1; 2017, ch. 123, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Section 3 of Acts 1955, ch. 209, reads as follows:

“That it is hereby determined and declared that the purpose of this act is to do that which the state welfare demands, and the state public policy requires:

“(a) That the migration and loss of the people of Tennessee, who are compelled to leave the territorial limits of the state, daily, weekly, monthly and yearly to obtain employment and earn a livelihood be retarded and reduced.

“(b) That the conditions of unemployment existing statewide in Tennessee be relieved thereby reducing the evils attendant thereto.

“(c) That the average family income in Tennessee be raised and increased as much as possible, but to an amount at least the average over the United States.

“(d) That a means be provided for the citizens of communities to promote and develop industry in their areas, when it is possible for them to do so in their separate and individual capacities.

“(e) That a balanced economic development highly essential to the welfare of this state be promoted.

“(f) That the reconversion from war time and civil defense economy to peace time pursuits be expedited by a program for readjustment of employment to accord with employment problems necessarily arising from changed conditions.

“(g) That the present and prospective health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment and the general welfare of the citizens demand as a public purpose, the development within Tennessee of commercial, industrial, agricultural and manufacturing enterprises by the several municipalities.

“(h) That the means and measures herein authorized to promote such enterprises are, as a matter of public policy, for the public purposes of the several municipalities, and the state of Tennessee.

“(i) That the present and prospective promotion of health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment, and the general welfare of the state requires the measures that are herein and hereby authorized, and to that end will afford ready and attractive markets for farm and garden products, for the development of natural resources, and for the conversion of raw materials of farm, mine and forest into finished products for the general welfare of each of such municipalities, and the entire people of the state.

“(j) That the accomplishment of the things herein authorized to be done by the several municipalities will give to them local benefits peculiar to each, and general benefits to the entire state.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added “in a form prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury” at the end of (c)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 123, § 3. April 12, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Local community groups as nonprofit organizations under T.C.A. § 5-9-109. OAG 10-19, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (2/23/10).

5-9-110. Animal welfare.

The several counties of the state, after the affirmative vote on reference of the question to the people, shall be empowered to levy a tax and provide for the administration of its proceeds for the purpose of securing humane treatment of animals therein that are not subject to the state game and fish laws.

Acts 1981, ch. 267, § 1.

5-9-111. Funds for dues of associations composed of or for the benefit of county officeholders.

The legislative body of each county is authorized to appropriate funds for the purpose of defraying the cost of dues to associations of particular county officeholders or associations made up of groups of county officeholders.

If the county legislative body of a county appropriates funds for the dues in such association for the benefit of the county mayor, county highway superintendent or members of the county legislative body, then such an appropriation sufficient to pay the cost of the annual association dues in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessor of property, county clerk, state court clerks, sheriff, register of deeds and trustee in at least one (1) such association, as designated by the officeholder, shall be likewise appropriated by the county legislative body, upon the request of the officials. The county legislative body is authorized to appropriate sufficient amounts in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) to pay such association dues in the discretion of the county legislative body.

No such funds appropriated shall be used for lobbying activities as defined in § 3-6-102, for the purpose of influencing legislative action relative to benefits or salaries of the association's members.

Acts 1987, ch. 401, § 1; 1994, ch. 887, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-9-112. Assistance to low-income elderly residents.

The legislative body of each county is authorized to appropriate funds for the purpose of providing assistance to low-income elderly residents of the county.

If a county chooses to provide assistance, such funds shall be appropriated on an annual basis based on the particular needs of eligible persons, as determined by the county legislative body.

The county legislative body is authorized to develop guidelines for eligibility and participation in applying for assistance authorized pursuant to this section.

Acts 1990, ch. 882, § 1.

5-9-113. Affordable housing and workforce housing.

The county legislative body of any county with a metropolitan government and a population not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is authorized to appropriate funds for affordable housing or workforce housing.

As used in this section:

“Affordable housing” means housing that, on an annual basis, costs thirty percent (30%) or less than the estimated median household income for households earning sixty percent (60%) or less of the area median income for the Nashville-Davidson County metropolitan statistical area as determined by the United States department of housing and urban development, adjusted for family size; and

“Workforce housing” means housing that, on an annual basis, costs thirty percent (30%) or less than the estimated median household income for households earning more than sixty percent (60%) and not to exceed one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the area median income for the Nashville-Davidson County metropolitan statistical area as determined by the United States department of housing and urban development, adjusted for family size.

Acts 2015, ch. 377, § 1; 2018, ch. 791, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, inserted “of any county with a metropolitan government and a population not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census,” in (a); in (b)(1), substituted “sixty percent (60%) or less of” for “sixty percent (60%) or less than”; and, near the end of (b)(1) and at the end of (b)(2), substituted “the area median income for the Nashville-Davidson County metropolitan statistical area as determined by the United States department of housing and urban development, adjusted for family size” for “the median household income for the applicable county based on the number of persons in the household, as established by the ‘Median Household Income in the Past 12 Months by Household Size’ (B19019) from the most recently available United States Census Bureau American Community Survey”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 377, § 2. May 8, 2015.

Acts 2018, ch. 791, § 2. April 20, 2018.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislation providing that a metropolitan government may issue bonds and notes under the Local Government Public Obligations Act must provide for a referendum. OAG 16-07, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (2/24/2016).